Maine, session 132, LD2026.
Be it enacted by the People of the State of Maine as follows:
Sec. 1. 7 MRSA §86, sub-§5, as amended by PL 2025, c. 161, §3, is further
amended by amending the first blocked paragraph to read:
In determining distribution under this subsection, an allowance may not be made on
premiums offered and paid by a licensee at any competition or event held other than during
the period in which its annual fair is held judged up to 24 hours prior to the licensed fair
dates or during the licensed fair dates. Allowance may not be made or consideration given
for lump sums, payments or premiums previously arranged and agreed upon for the
presentation and display of any animals or products without regard to competition or event.
Emergency clause. In view of the emergency cited in the preamble, this legislation
takes effect when approved.